Massachusetts, session 194th, S1023.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
(a) There shall be a special legislative commission to investigate and study the issuance 
of permits and approvals for housing projects under section 21 of chapter 40B of the General 
Laws. The commission shall examine the use of such permits and approvals and their impact on 
the environment and abutting properties.  
(b) The commission shall consist of the following members: the secretary of the 
executive office of housing and livable communities or their designee, who shall serve as chair; 1 
member appointed by the governor; 1 member appointed by the senate president; 1 member 
appointed by the speaker of the house; 1 member appointed by the senate minority leader; 1 
member appointed by the house minority leader; 1 member appointed by the attorney general; 
the president of the Environmental League of Massachusetts, or her designee; the executive 
director of the Massachusetts law reform institute, or her designee; the executive director of the 
Massachusetts area planning council, or his designee; the president of the conservation law 

of 2 13 foundation, or his designee; the executive director of the Massachusetts municipal association, or 
his designee; and up to 3 additional members to be added by the chair, at their discretion, to 
provide expertise on housing or environmental policy.  
(c) Not later than March 6, 2026, the commission shall submit its report and 
recommendations for proposed legislation to the senate and house committees on ways and 
means, the chairs of the joint committee on housing, and the clerks of the house and senate. The 
executive office of housing and livable communities shall publish the report on its website.